Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/TechTerms.aff
FLAG num
SFX 198 N 1
SFX 198 0 anMatrix .

SFX 199 N 1
SFX 199 0 anMaxterms .

SFX 200 N 1
SFX 200 0 anMinimize .

SFX 201 N 1
SFX 201 0 anMinterms .

SFX 202 N 1
SFX 202 0 annoy .

SFX 203 N 1
SFX 203 0 Anomalies .

SFX 204 N 1
SFX 204 0 anQ .

SFX 205 N 1
SFX 205 0 anRegion .

SFX 206 N 1
SFX 206 0 ans .

SFX 207 N 1
SFX 207 0 anSelect .

SFX 208 N 1
SFX 208 0 anStrings .

SFX 209 N 1
SFX 209 0 ant .

SFX 210 N 1
SFX 210 0 anTable .

SFX 211 N 1
SFX 211 0 anticevian .

SFX 212 N 1
SFX 212 0 antine .

SFX 213 N 1
SFX 213 0 anVariables .

SFX 214 N 1
SFX 214 0 Appearance .

SFX 215 N 1
SFX 215 0 Append .

SFX 216 N 1
SFX 216 0 AppendBinary .

SFX 217 N 1
SFX 217 0 Application .

SFX 218 N 1
SFX 218 0 Apply .

SFX 219 N 1
SFX 219 0 Approximant .

SFX 220 N 1
SFX 220 0 Approximate .

SFX 221 N 1
SFX 221 0 aptopurine .

SFX 222 N 1
SFX 222 0 Aquamarine .

SFX 223 N 1
SFX 223 0 ar .

SFX 224 N 1
SFX 224 0 ararajan .

SFX 225 N 1
SFX 225 0 Archive .

SFX 226 N 1
SFX 226 0 ard .

SFX 227 N 1
SFX 227 0 ards .

SFX 228 N 1
SFX 228 0 Area .

SFX 229 N 1
SFX 229 0 areal .

SFX 230 N 1
SFX 230 0 arEquationsToMatrices .

SFX 231 N 1
SFX 231 0 arFilter .

SFX 232 N 1
SFX 232 0 arFractionalOptimization .

SFX 233 N 1
SFX 233 0 arFractionalTransform .

SFX 234 N 1
SFX 234 0 Arg .

SFX 235 N 1
SFX 235 0 ArgMax .

SFX 236 N 1
SFX 236 0 ArgMin .

SFX 237 N 1
SFX 237 0 ArgPlot .

SFX 238 N 1
SFX 238 0 arGradientImage .

SFX 239 N 1
SFX 239 0 arithm .

SFX 240 N 1
SFX 240 0 Arithmetic .

SFX 241 N 1
SFX 241 0 arity .

SFX 242 N 1
SFX 242 0 arnshaw .

SFX 243 N 1
SFX 243 0 Around .

SFX 244 N 1
SFX 244 0 Array .

SFX 245 N 1
SFX 245 0 ArrayFormat .

SFX 246 N 1
SFX 246 0 ArrayLayer .

SFX 247 N 1
SFX 247 0 ArrayQ .

SFX 248 N 1
SFX 248 0 Arrays .

SFX 249 N 1
SFX 249 0 ArrayToString .

SFX 250 N 1
SFX 250 0 arrow .

SFX 251 N 1
SFX 251 0 Arrow .

SFX 252 N 1
SFX 252 0 ArrowBar .

SFX 253 N 1
SFX 253 0 ArrowDownArrow .

SFX 254 N 1
SFX 254 0 ArrowLeftArrow .

SFX 255 N 1
SFX 255 0 ArrowLength .

SFX 256 N 1
SFX 256 0 ArrowRightArrow .

SFX 257 N 1
SFX 257 0 ArrowUpArrow .

SFX 258 N 1
SFX 258 0 arthImpactData .

SFX 259 N 1
SFX 259 0 arthMass .

SFX 260 N 1
SFX 260 0 arthquakeData .

SFX 261 N 1
SFX 261 0 arthRadius .

SFX 262 N 1
SFX 262 0 artInterval .

SFX 263 N 1
SFX 263 0 artPacletManager .

SFX 264 N 1
SFX 264 0 ary .

SFX 265 N 1
SFX 265 0 as .

SFX 266 N 1
SFX 266 0 ason .

SFX 267 N 1
SFX 267 0 AspectRatio .

SFX 268 N 1
SFX 268 0 assen .

SFX 269 N 1
SFX 269 0 Associates .

SFX 270 N 1
SFX 270 0 Assortativity .

SFX 271 N 1
SFX 271 0 Assumptions .

SFX 272 N 1
SFX 272 0 asterSunday .

SFX 273 N 1
SFX 273 0 asterSundayGreekOrthodox .

SFX 274 N 1
SFX 274 0 Asynchronous .

SFX 275 N 1
SFX 275 0 AsynchronousTask .

SFX 276 N 1
SFX 276 0 ation .

SFX 277 N 1
SFX 277 0 AttentionLayer .

SFX 278 N 1
SFX 278 0 Attributes .

SFX 279 N 1
SFX 279 0 AudioStream .

SFX 280 N 1
SFX 280 0 aunay .

SFX 281 N 1
SFX 281 0 aunayMesh .

SFX 282 N 1
SFX 282 0 aunayTriangulation .

SFX 283 N 1
SFX 283 0 aunayTriangulationQ .

SFX 284 N 1
SFX 284 0 AuthorizationCaching .

SFX 285 N 1
SFX 285 0 AutoConvert .

SFX 286 N 1
SFX 286 0 AutoCreate .

SFX 287 N 1
SFX 287 0 AutoDelete .

SFX 288 N 1
SFX 288 0 AutomorphismGroup .

SFX 289 N 1
SFX 289 0 AutoOverwrite .

SFX 290 N 1
SFX 290 0 AutoQuoteCharacters .

SFX 291 N 1
SFX 291 0 AutoReplacements .

SFX 292 N 1
SFX 292 0 AutoSave .

SFX 293 N 1
SFX 293 0 AutoSpellCheck .

SFX 294 N 1
SFX 294 0 AutoStyles .

SFX 295 N 1
SFX 295 0 Axes .

SFX 296 N 1
SFX 296 0 AxesStyle .

SFX 297 N 1
SFX 297 0 ayed .

SFX 298 N 1
SFX 298 0 B .

SFX 299 N 1
SFX 299 0 Background .

SFX 300 N 1
SFX 300 0 BackgroundHalftoneAngle .

SFX 301 N 1
SFX 301 0 BackgroundHalftoneDensity .

SFX 302 N 1
SFX 302 0 Backgrounds .

SFX 303 N 1
SFX 303 0 backs .

SFX 304 N 1
SFX 304 0 BackSubstitution .

SFX 305 N 1
SFX 305 0 Backward .

SFX 306 N 1
SFX 306 0 baki .

SFX 307 N 1
SFX 307 0 band .

SFX 308 N 1
SFX 308 0 Band .

SFX 309 N 1
SFX 309 0 Bar .

SFX 310 N 1
SFX 310 0 BarnesG .

SFX 311 N 1
SFX 311 0 base .

SFX 312 N 1
SFX 312 0 Baseline .

SFX 313 N 1
SFX 313 0 BaselineShift .

SFX 314 N 1
SFX 314 0 BaseName .

SFX 315 N 1
SFX 315 0 BaseStyle .

SFX 316 N 1
SFX 316 0 Basis .

SFX 317 N 1
SFX 317 0 bauer .

SFX 318 N 1
SFX 318 0 baum .

SFX 319 N 1
SFX 319 0 becquerel .

SFX 320 N 1
SFX 320 0 becquerels .

SFX 321 N 1
SFX 321 0 Begin .

SFX 322 N 1
SFX 322 0 Behavior .

SFX 323 N 1
SFX 323 0 Behind .

SFX 324 N 1
SFX 324 0 belian .

SFX 325 N 1
SFX 325 0 Bend .

SFX 326 N 1
SFX 326 0 bender .

SFX 327 N 1
SFX 327 0 Beta .

SFX 328 N 1
SFX 328 0 BetaRegularized .

SFX 329 N 1
SFX 329 0 BezierCurveBox .

SFX 330 N 1
SFX 330 0 BezierCurveBoxOptions .

SFX 331 N 1
SFX 331 0 Bias .

SFX 332 N 1
SFX 332 0 Binarize .

SFX 333 N 1
SFX 333 0 Binary .

SFX 334 N 1
SFX 334 0 BinomialDistribution .

SFX 335 N 1
SFX 335 0 Bisection .

SFX 336 N 1
SFX 336 0 Bisector .

SFX 337 N 1
SFX 337 0 biński .

SFX 338 N 1
SFX 338 0 bit .

SFX 339 N 1
SFX 339 0 bits .

SFX 340 N 1
SFX 340 0 Bits .

SFX 341 N 1
SFX 341 0 BlackmanWindow .

SFX 342 N 1
SFX 342 0 BlockDiagonalForm .

SFX 343 N 1
SFX 343 0 BlockForm .

SFX 344 N 1
SFX 344 0 Blue .

SFX 345 N 1
SFX 345 0 boardNotebook .

SFX 346 N 1
SFX 346 0 boeuf .

SFX 347 N 1
SFX 347 0 bolo .

SFX 348 N 1
SFX 348 0 Boundary .

SFX 349 N 1
SFX 349 0 BoundingBox .

SFX 350 N 1
SFX 350 0 BoundingBoxSizePacket .

SFX 351 N 1
SFX 351 0 Bounds .

SFX 352 N 1
SFX 352 0 Box .

SFX 353 N 1
SFX 353 0 BoxAlignment .

SFX 354 N 1
SFX 354 0 BoxAutoDelete .

SFX 355 N 1
SFX 355 0 BoxBackground .

SFX 356 N 1
SFX 356 0 BoxDividers .

SFX 357 N 1
SFX 357 0 Boxes .

SFX 358 N 1
SFX 358 0 BoxFormInlineCells .

SFX 359 N 1
SFX 359 0 BoxFormNamesPacket .

SFX 360 N 1
SFX 360 0 BoxFrame .

SFX 361 N 1
SFX 361 0 BoxItemSize .

SFX 362 N 1
SFX 362 0 BoxItemStyle .

SFX 363 N 1
SFX 363 0 BoxOptions .

SFX 364 N 1
SFX 364 0 BoxSpacings .

SFX 365 N 1
SFX 365 0 BoxStyle .

SFX 366 N 1
SFX 366 0 BracketOptions .

SFX 367 N 1
SFX 367 0 Break .

SFX 368 N 1
SFX 368 0 brock .

SFX 369 N 1
SFX 369 0 Brown .

SFX 370 N 1
SFX 370 0 Browse .

SFX 371 N 1
SFX 371 0 BSplineCurveBox .

SFX 372 N 1
SFX 372 0 BSplineCurveBoxOptions .

SFX 373 N 1
SFX 373 0 Buffer .

SFX 374 N 1
SFX 374 0 Build .

SFX 375 N 1
SFX 375 0 Button .

SFX 376 N 1
SFX 376 0 By .

SFX 377 N 1
SFX 377 0 byte .

SFX 378 N 1
SFX 378 0 ByteArray .

SFX 379 N 1
SFX 379 0 ByteCount .

SFX 380 N 1
SFX 380 0 bytes .

SFX 381 N 1
SFX 381 0 c .

SFX 382 N 1
SFX 382 0 C .

SFX 383 N 1
SFX 383 0 cade .

SFX 384 N 1
SFX 384 0 candela .

SFX 385 N 1
SFX 385 0 candelas .

SFX 386 N 1
SFX 386 0 Cap .

SFX 387 N 1
SFX 387 0 Case .

SFX 388 N 1
SFX 388 0 Cases .

SFX 389 N 1
SFX 389 0 CastanMatrix .

SFX 390 N 1
SFX 390 0 Category .

SFX 391 N 1
SFX 391 0 caustic .

SFX 392 N 1
SFX 392 0 CD .

SFX 393 N 1
SFX 393 0 CDF .

SFX 394 N 1
SFX 394 0 ce .

SFX 395 N 1
SFX 395 0 Cell .

SFX 396 N 1
SFX 396 0 CellBracket .

SFX 397 N 1
SFX 397 0 CellCentroid .

SFX 398 N 1
SFX 398 0 CellCount .

SFX 399 N 1
SFX 399 0 CellEvaluation .

SFX 400 N 1
SFX 400 0 CellHighlight .

SFX 401 N 1
SFX 401 0 CellIndex .

SFX 402 N 1
SFX 402 0 CellLabel .

SFX 403 N 1
SFX 403 0 CellLoading .

SFX 404 N 1
SFX 404 0 CellMarker .

SFX 405 N 1
SFX 405 0 CellMeasure .

SFX 406 N 1
SFX 406 0 CellQuality .

SFX 407 N 1
SFX 407 0 CellRendering .

SFX 408 N 1
SFX 408 0 Cells .

SFX 409 N 1
SFX 409 0 CellShapeFunction .

SFX 410 N 1
SFX 410 0 CellStyle .

SFX 411 N 1
SFX 411 0 CellTags .

SFX 412 N 1
SFX 412 0 CellWarning .

SFX 413 N 1
SFX 413 0 center .

SFX 414 N 1
SFX 414 0 Center .

SFX 415 N 1
SFX 415 0 Centering .

SFX 416 N 1
SFX 416 0 centers .

SFX 417 N 1
SFX 417 0 Centrality .

SFX 418 N 1
SFX 418 0 Centroid .

SFX 419 N 1
SFX 419 0 Certificate .

SFX 420 N 1
SFX 420 0 CertificateCheck .

SFX 421 N 1
SFX 421 0 cevian .

SFX 422 N 1
SFX 422 0 Chain .

SFX 423 N 1
SFX 423 0 Change .

SFX 424 N 1
SFX 424 0 ChangeTimes .
