Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/TechTerms.dic
Abs/234,237
anticomplement/264,1994
Ball/212,1268
Bour/306,1062,1080,1416,1875
Box/313,578,640,764,802,882,1012,1018,1020,1029,1258,1546,1558,1690,1903,1919,1976,1977,2055,2077,2137,2368
Bra/326
Byte/244,245,247,249,524,546,1737,1740
Cell/289,300,301,312,349,366,424,512,513,641,654,702,783,808,809,846,919,922,923,928,1029,1030,1031,1032,1033,1121,1123,1124,1125,1182,1258,1433,1434,1436,1437,1439,1440,1546,1690,1733
circum/211,413,421,448,450,500,812,813,1189,1190,1322,1674,1886
Clear/155,278,528,1802,2155
Clip/345,990,1808,1813,1814,1890
Closing/292,927
Coefficient/248,673,1510,1709,1989
colog/239
Constant/244,246,1277,1819,1920,1994,2237
ConvexHull/228,1572,1583
counit/241
Default/296,315,365,375,474,521,697,698,805,956,979,1008,1009,1015,1016,1034,1035,1117,1317,1319,1439,1582,1639,1651,1653,1679,1734,1763,1797,1855,2137,2138,2204,2205,2228,2261,2324,2326
demi/226,227
DeviceExecute/274
DeviceWrite/373
Dirichlet/327,429,493,527,665,890,1432,1441,2274,2372
Do/337
Down/251,252,257,1471,1472,1473,1474
E/242,258,259,260,261,272,273
Erlang/298,382,665,858
Exact/341,1687,1889,1971
Export/291,378,1012,1014,1773,2132
exsec/209
Extract/225,568,1454
File/314,370,379,525,582,934,947,1013,1154,1302,1624,1625,1626,1627,1629,1630,1632,1634,1636,1637,1854,2076
FileTemplate/218
For/155,383
Forward/305
Full/295,602
Get/350,513,845,989,1050,1178,1504,1581,1778
Grid/312,352,353,355,356,360,361,362,363,364,553,600,810,1029,1033,1072,1095,1506,1507
Grün/318
hexa/347,510,538,554,570,592,593,594
IncludeConstant/316
Interval/335,1095,1339,1548,1549,1577,1655,2016,2084,2302
Inverse/328,393,442,517,660,814,865,866,1024,1025,1026,1027,1028,1053,1056,1064,1065,1067,1140,1152,1156,1279,1387,1388,1389,1390,1391,1392,1393,1394,1395,1396,1397,1398,1446,1574,1803,1887,1888,2037,2062,2104,2146,2275,2362,2365,2374,2410
Invisible/217,2235
Item/267,352,363,2076,2137
Left/251,252,256,269,679,680,681,1069,1964,1966,2181,2182,2183,2280,2281,2282,2312,2313,2314,2315,2335,2336
Line/10,11,230,231,232,233,238
ListPicker/352,355,363
Locator/286,352,363,415,1783,1784,1785,1919
LU/304
Max/255,325,405,475
Medium/222,344,1736,1867,2013,2083,2111,2290,2346
Menu/214,481,926,1376,1510,1773,2092,2137,2342
merc/221
milliohm/13,265,1994
multiline/223
Negative/334,601,1331,1620,1902,1911,2030
nona/324,1085,1086,1087,1091,1160,1161,1494,1530,1967,1994,2117
Not/276,499,558,675,711,712,713,714,715,716,717,718,719,720,721,722,723,724,725,726,727,728,729,730,731,732,733,734,735,736,737,738,739,740,741,742,743,744,745,746,747,748,749,750,751,805,853,933,1106,1107,1108,1109,1110,1111,1112
Number/340,491,597,935,975,976,978,980,981,982,983,984,1012,1013,1505,1550,1621,1695,1696,1697,1700,1702,1703,1704,1706,1707,1710,1775,1821,1869,2032,2074,2132
Open/215,216,858,860,861,880,954,1054,1304,1556,1906,1907,2102,2186,2284,2383,2384
Output/289,518,519,520,1012,1017,1020,1124,1510,1557,1631,1941,2079,2130,2263,2266
Parameter/331,451,497,884
Part/322,1194,1195,1196,1197,1199,1203,1213,1214
Paste/290,358,375
Perpendicular/336
Put/215,2404
Random/244,443,474,477,488,492,842,1053,1079,1095,1105,1159,1277,1328,1329,1427,1790,1803,1821,1827,1828,1850,1910,1997,2019,2020,2121,2142,2160,2279,2333,2341,2354,2378
Raw/244,357,578,1573,2068,2301
Read/333,378,1095,1501,1510,1511,1865,2093,2132
Region/332,348,351,418,633,639,650,657,658,816,849,1053,1277,1339,1570,1575,1576,1613,1642,1643,1816,1817,1856,1858,1869,1938,2076,2152,2302,2376
Remote/284,501,503,986,1990,1992
Remove/161,275,279,299,425,427,570,626,1321,1764,1862,2008,2028,2321
Rest/262,263,1960
Root/219,645,773,1342,1526,1569,1708,1913,1994,2145
Rosen/368
Sphere/352,1822
Split/376
Stack/321,487,765,772,785
Style/352,354,363,578,603,1012,1175,1421,1580,1626,1632,1854
SystemsModelDelay/220
Toggler/309,352,363
Tooltip/352,363,606
TravelingSalesman/351
Tube/329,330,352,363,371,372
Up/251,252,253
UpTee/251
vendeka/169,170,174,206,338,339,377,380,384,385,495,496,544
Witten/317
WorldData/311
WorldGrid/323,2137
Write/333,700,1095,1501,2132
Wronski/174,206
Yellow/369,1114,1497,1694
